Vermont, session 2025-2026, H283.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 10 V.S.A. § 1424 is amended to read:
§ 1424. USE OF PUBLIC WATERS
(a) The Secretary may establish rules to implement the provisions of this
chapter, including:
(1) Rules to regulate the use of public waters of the State by:
(A) defining areas on public waters wherein certain uses may be
conducted;
(B) defining the uses which may be conducted in the defined areas;
(C) regulating the conduct in these areas, including the size of motors
allowed, size of boats allowed, allowable speeds for boats, and prohibiting the
use of motors or houseboats; and
(D) regulating the time various uses may be conducted.
(2) Rules to govern the surface levels of lakes, ponds, and reservoirs that
are public waters of the State.
(b) The Secretary in establishing rules under subdivision (a)(2) of this
section shall consider the size and flow of the navigable waters,; the
predominant use of adjacent lands,; the depth of the water,; the predominant
use of the waters prior to regulation,; the uses for which the water is
adaptable,; the availability of fishing, boating, and bathing facilities,; the
scenic beauty,; and recreational uses of the area.
VT LEG #380555 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.283
2025 Page 3 of 4
(c) The Secretary shall attempt to manage the public waters so that the
various uses may be enjoyed in a reasonable manner, in the best interests of all
the citizens of the State. To the extent possible, the Secretary shall provide for
all normal uses.
(d) [Repealed.]
(e) On receipt of a written request that the Secretary adopt, amend, or
repeal a rule with respect to the use of public waters signed by not less than
one person, the Secretary shall consider the adoption of rules authorized under
this section and take appropriate action as required under 3 V.S.A. § 806.
(f)(1) By rule, the Secretary may shall delegate authority under this section
for the regulation of public waters where:
(1)(A) The the delegation is to a municipality that is adjacent to or
which contains the water; and
(B) the municipality requests the delegation to promote the public
good by restricting or prohibiting wake boats on the water for which it is
seeking delegation; and
(2)(C) The the municipality accepts the delegation by creating or
amending a bylaw or ordinance for regulation of the water.
(2) Appeals from a final act of the municipality under the bylaw or
ordinance shall be taken to the Environmental Division. The Secretary may
VT LEG #380555 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.283
2025 Page 4 of 4
terminate a delegation for cause or without cause upon six months’ notice to
the municipality.
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on passage.
VT LEG #380555 v.1